Hawaii, session 2026, HB1420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 95, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, section 3, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall administer payments for supportive services, including employment services, that assist the residents participating in the pilot program to retain housing, improve their health status, and maximize their ability to live and, when possible, work in the community. Supportive services may include mental health, substance abuse, counseling, and daily living activities. The supportive services [funding of not more than] payments shall not exceed $800 per unit per month [is intended to be matched with federal medicaid funds].  The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions may enter into memoranda of agreement with the counties or specialized nonprofit organizations as necessary to implement this section.  The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall be exempt from chapters 103D and 103F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in selecting a qualified nonprofit organization to administer the supportive services payments and, without regard to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, may establish rules and qualification standards for participants of the supportive housing pilot program." SECTION 2.  Act 95, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is amended by amending section 8 to read as follows: "SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023, and shall be repealed on June 30, [2025.] 2030." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on June 29, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________